es: Tipo de depósito: Depósito integral (adjunto); Sin depósito; Compatible con depósito remoto; Otro
it: Tipo di serbatoio: Serbatoio integrato (fissato); Senza serbatoio; Compatibile con serbatoio remoto; Altro
pl: Typ zbiornika: Zintegrowany (dołączony) zbiornik; Brak zbiornika; Kompatybilny z zewnętrznym zbiornikiem; Inne
en: Reservoir type: Integral (attached) reservoir; No reservoir; Remote reservoir compatible; Other
sk-SK: Typ nádržky: Integrovaný (pripojený) rezervoár; Bez rezervoára; Kompatibilné s oddeleným rezervoárom; Iné
th: ประเภทอ่างเก็บน้ำ: มีที่เก็บน้ำในตัว; ไม่มีที่เก็บน้ำ; รองรับที่เก็บน้ำระยะไกล; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Rezervuaro tipas: Integruotas (pritvirtintas) rezervuaras; Be rezervuaro; Suderinama su atskiru rezervuaru; Kita
zh-TW: 儲液罐類型: 一體式 (附加) 儲水袋; 無儲水袋; 相容於外接式儲水袋; 其他
cs: Typ nádrže: Integrovaný (připojený) rezervoár; Bez rezervoáru; Kompatibilní s odděleným rezervoárem; Jiný
de: Reservoirtyp: Integriertes (befestigtes) Reservoir; Kein Reservoir; Kompatibel mit externem Reservoir; Sonstiges
fr: Type de réservoir: Réservoir intégré (fixé); Sans réservoir; Compatible avec un réservoir externe; Autre
sv: Reservoartyp: Inbyggd (fast) behållare; Ingen behållare; Kompatibel med extern behållare; Annat
nl: Reservoir type: Geïntegreerd (vast) reservoir; Geen reservoir; Compatibel met extern reservoir; Overig
ru: Тип резервуара: Встроенный (прикрепленный) резервуар; Без резервуара; Совместимость с выносным резервуаром; Другое
da: Beholdertype: Integreret (fastgjort) beholder; Ingen beholder; Kompatibel med ekstern beholder; Andet
tr: Rezervuar tipi: Entegre (sabit) hazne; Hazne yok; Harici hazneyle uyumlu; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de reservatório: Reservatório integrado (anexado); Sem reservatório; Compatível com reservatório remoto; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta rezervoarja: Integriran (pritrjen) rezervoar; Brez rezervoarja; Združljivo z zunanjim rezervoarjem; Drugo
zh-CN: 储液罐类型: 一体式（附属）水袋; 无水袋; 兼容外置水袋; 其他
ja: 貯水池の種類: 一体型（付属）リザーバー; リザーバーなし; リモートリザーバー互換; その他
vi: Loại hồ chứa: Bình chứa tích hợp (gắn liền); Không có bình chứa; Tương thích bình chứa từ xa; Khác
ko: 리저버 유형: 일체형(부착형) 리저버; 리저버 없음; 원격 리저버 호환; 기타
fi: Säiliön tyyppi: Integroitu (kiinnitetty) säiliö; Ei säiliötä; Yhteensopiva erillisen säiliön kanssa; Muu
el: Τύπος δοχείου υγρών: Ενσωματωμένο (προσαρτημένο) δοχείο; Χωρίς δοχείο; Συμβατότητα με απομακρυσμένο δοχείο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul rezervorului: Rezervor integral (atașat); Fără rezervor; Compatibil cu rezervor extern; Altele
pt-BR: Reservatório tipo: Reservatório integrado (anexado); Sem reservatório; Compatível com reservatório remoto; Outro
hu: Tartály típusa: Beépített (csatlakoztatott) tartály; Tartály nélküli; Külső tartállyal kompatibilis; Egyéb
nb: Reservoartype: Integrert (festet) reservoar; Uten reservoar; Kompatibel med eksternt reservoar; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta rezervoara: Ugrađeni (pričvršćeni) spremnik; Bez spremnika; Kompatibilno s vanjskim spremnikom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип резервоар: Вграден (прикрепен) резервоар; Без резервоар; Съвместим с външен резервоар; Други